California statutes. Education Code
(1) On or before March 31, 2023, develop and adopt a plan delineating the expenditure of funds apportioned pursuant to this section, including the professional development of teachers, administrators, paraprofessionals, and classified staff. The plan shall be presented in a public meeting of the governing board of the school district, county board of education, or governing body of the charter school, before its adoption in a subsequent public meeting.

(2) On or before September 30, 2023, and again on or before September 30, 2026, report detailed expenditure information to the department, including, but not limited to, specific purchases made and the number of teachers,
 administrators, paraprofessional educators, or classified staff that received professional development. The department shall determine the format for this report.

(3) Ensure that none of their local educational agency employees are charged a fee for services allowable under this section, including, but not limited to, beginning teacher induction program costs, during the grant period pursuant to this section.

(e) The department shall summarize the information reported pursuant to subdivision (d) and shall submit the summary to the appropriate budget subcommittees and policy committees of the Legislature and to the Department of Finance on or before January 1, 2024, and again on or before
 November 30, 2026. The department shall determine the format for this report to optimize its production within existing resources, but shall include aggregated information on planned uses of the funds by allowable use and subject area. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) Funding apportioned pursuant to this section is subject to the annual audits required by Section 41020.

(g) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts
 from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 52, Sec. 18.   (AB 181)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Multitiered Systems of Support [41490. - 41490.]

41490.

(a) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent to apportion to the Orange County Department of Education in the manner, and for the purposes, set forth in this section. The Orange County Department of Education shall encumber or expend the funds apportioned pursuant to this subdivision on or before June 30, 2026, except as provided in subdivision (h).

(b) The Orange County Department of Education, in consultation with the Superintendent and the executive director of the
 state board, shall award no less than thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a) as grants to local educational agencies for the purpose of funding schoolwide and districtwide implementation of services or practices aligned to the Multi-Tiered Systems of Support framework developed under the “Scale Up MTSS Statewide” (SUMS) project. The grants shall be awarded to local educational agencies on or before December 15, 2021. Any funds not awarded on or before December 15, 2021, shall be available for the Orange County Department of Education, in consultation with the Superintendent and the executive director of the state board, to award as grants to local educational agencies on or before December 15, 2022.

(1) Grant funds awarded to local educational agencies shall be used to support the implementation of high quality integrated academic, behavioral, and social-emotional learning practices in an integrated
 multitiered system of support at the schoolwide level, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Educator and leader training on the foundations of the California Multi-Tiered System of Support framework and practices, as developed by the SUMS project.

(B) Ongoing training and coaching support to schoolsite educators and leaders in deepening the implementation of high leverage practices for integrated academic, behavioral, and social-emotional learning across tiers throughout the school community.

(C) Ongoing training and support to school and local educational agency leaders in aligning practices, policies, and structures to create and sustain a schoolwide and agencywide integrated multitiered system of support.

(D) Establishing school-
 and local educational agency-level multitiered system of support teams to support implementation efforts.

(2) Grants shall be awarded with priority to local educational agencies serving a high number of unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02, that have participated in local educational agency-level training to implement an integrated multitiered system of support.

(3) Local educational agencies receiving funds shall measure and report on implementation fidelity at least annually using the tools and resources developed by the SUMS project. Data shall be reported to the Orange County Department of Education in a form available to the public.

(4) (A) On or before September 30 of each fiscal year until the Orange County Department of Education has fully expended the funds allocated
 pursuant to this subdivision, the Orange County Department of Education shall submit an annual report to the Superintendent summarizing how it used the funds in the prior fiscal year. The Superintendent shall provide copies of these reports to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, the state board, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office.

(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) (1) The Superintendent shall establish a process, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the executive director of the state board, to select a local educational agency, a local educational agency in partnership with an institution of higher education or nonprofit educational service provider, or a consortia, to partner with the
 Orange County Department of Education and the Butte County Office of Education to expand the state’s capacity to support local educational agencies’ implementation of social-emotional learning, trauma screening, trauma-informed practices, and culturally relevant, affirming, and sustaining practices. The selected entity, known as a partner entity, shall be selected on or before February 15, 2022. No more than twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) of the amount appropriated in subdivision (a) is available for purposes of this subdivision.

(2) The partner entity shall have demonstrated expertise in developing and delivering high quality professional learning to educators in social-emotional learning, trauma-informed practices, and culturally relevant, affirming, and sustaining practices in a manner that aligns with local multitiered systems of support. The partner entity shall support the Orange County Department of Education and the Butte County
 Office of Education in offering high quality professional learning to educators and school leaders by performing all of the following functions:

(A) Creating, collecting, and curating resources for educators on social-emotional learning, trauma screening, trauma-informed practices, and culturally relevant, affirming, and sustaining practices.

(B) Providing ongoing training and support in the use of trauma screening tools and mental health service referrals, school climate surveys, and the use of tool and survey data.

(C) Providing grants to local educational agencies to support both of the following:

(i) Convening professional learning communities of educators and school leaders.

(ii) Providing ongoing training and coaching to educators and school leaders.

(3) In performing the work described in this subdivision, the partner entity, in partnership with the Orange County Department of Education and the Butte County Office of Education, shall, to the extent practicable, leverage current research and work related to how educators and school leaders can best address the social-emotional needs of pupils, and consult with experts in the field on matters related to trauma screening and trauma-informed practices.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “high quality professional learning” shall include, but not be limited to, professional learning that is content-focused, incorporates active learning using adult learning theory, supports collaboration in job-embedded contexts, uses models and modeling of effective practices, provides coaching and expert
 support, and offers opportunities for feedback.

(d) A local educational agency that receives a grant pursuant to subdivision (b), or high quality professional learning pursuant to subdivision (c), shall, as a condition of receiving the grant or high quality professional learning, provide to the Orange County Department of Education, the Butte County Office of Education, and the department any available outcome data resulting from the practices implemented, and participate in overall program evaluation.

(e) The Orange County Department of Education may expend up to one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the amount appropriated pursuant to subdivision (a) to support the administration of grants and provide support to the grantees pursuant to Department of Finance approval of an expenditure plan. The Orange County Department of Education shall not expend moneys pursuant to this
 subdivision sooner than 30 days after the Department of Finance provides written notification of the approval of the expenditure plan to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(f) (1) Any funds set aside pursuant to subdivision (b) that are not awarded on or before December 15, 2022, shall be available for the Orange County Department of Education to provide support to local educational agencies impacted by the fire-related state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor in January 2025 in providing high-quality integrated academic, behavioral, and social-emotional learning practices to pupils and educators. This may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Training, coaching, and supporting educators on trauma-informed practices, tools, and resources to meet the unique needs of each schoolsite.

(B) Grants to schools to support the educational and mental health needs of affected pupils and staff.

(C) Scaling up of supports provided by the Los Angeles County Office of Education.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (e), the Orange County Department of Education may expend up to 15 percent of the amount identified pursuant to this subdivision for administrative costs associated with supporting impacted local educational agencies.

(g) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(h) (1) Funds awarded pursuant
 to subdivision (b) that have been encumbered by a subgrantee but not yet expended may, upon review and approval by the Orange County Department of Education, be expended until June 30, 2027.

(2) Funds awarded pursuant to subdivision (b) that have not been encumbered may be utilized by the Orange County Department of Education for purposes of subdivision (f) until June 30, 2027.

(i) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues
 appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2020–21 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 13.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Targeted Instructional Improvement Block Grant [41540. - 41544.]

41540.

(a) There is hereby established the targeted instructional improvement block grant. Commencing with the 2005–06 fiscal year, the Superintendent shall apportion block grant funds to a school district in the same relative statewide proportion that the school district received in the 2003–04 fiscal year for the programs listed in Section 41541.

(b) If a school district is not in violation of a court order regarding desegregation, the school district may expend funds received pursuant to this article for any purpose authorized by the programs listed in Section 41541 as the statutes governing those programs read on January 1, 2004.

(c) For purposes of this article, “school district” includes a county office of education if county offices of education are eligible to receive funds for the programs that are listed in Section 41541. The block grant of a county office of education shall be based only on those programs for which it was eligible to receive funds in the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(d) A school that received funding in the 2000–01 fiscal year, or any fiscal year thereafter, from a desegregation program or a targeted instructional improvement grant program pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 54200) of Part 29, that was allocated by a school district as part of a court-ordered desegregation program before the school converted to a charter school, shall continue to receive its proportionate share of funding from the school district through the block grant established pursuant to this section if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The charter school continues to serve the same general population.

(2) The charter school implements the intended goals of the court order.

(3) The court order remains in effect.

(e) On and after July 1, 2006, subdivision (d) shall not apply to charter schools that receive funds through the Charter School Categorical Block Grant established pursuant to Section 47634.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 730, Sec. 10.5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

41541.

The targeted instructional improvement block grant shall include funding apportioned to school districts prior to January 1, 2005, for purposes of the following programs:

(a) Targeted instructional improvement as set forth in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 54200) of Part 29.

(b) Supplemental grants as set forth in Article 9 (commencing with Section 54760) of Chapter 9 of Part 29.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 871, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

41542.

Commencing with the 2006–07 fiscal year, the amount of funding a school district receives pursuant to this article shall be adjusted for inflation by the amount calculated pursuant to Section 42238.1 and for growth as measured by the regular average daily attendance used to calculate the second principal apportionment for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, unless otherwise provided in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 371, Sec. 3.   Effective September 20, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

41543.

In expending funds received pursuant to this article, a school district shall give first priority to funding the costs of a court-ordered desegregation program if the order exists and is still in force.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 871, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

41544.

(a) For a basic aid school district that was entitled to reimbursement pursuant to former Section 42247.4, as that section read on January 1, 2001, and that received an apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of former Section 42247.4, as that section read on January 1, 2001, because a court order directs pupils to transfer to that school district as part of the court-ordered voluntary pupil transfer program, the Superintendent, from the 2001–02 fiscal year to the 2012–13 fiscal year, inclusive, shall calculate an apportionment of state funds for that basic aid school district that provides 70 percent of the school district revenue limit calculated pursuant to former Section 42238, as that section read on January 1, 2013, that would have been apportioned to the school district from which the pupils were transferred for the
 average daily attendance of any pupils credited under that court order who did not attend the basic aid school district before the 1995–96 fiscal year.

(b) For a basic aid school district that was entitled to reimbursement pursuant to former Section 42247.4, as that section read on January 1, 2001, and that received an apportionment pursuant to subdivision (h) of former Section 42247.4, as that section read on January 1, 2001, because a court order directs pupils to transfer to that school district as part of the court-ordered voluntary pupil transfer program, the Superintendent, commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, shall calculate an apportionment of state funds for that basic aid school district that provides 70 percent of the school district local control funding formula base grant calculated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for the school district from which the pupils were transferred
 for the average daily attendance of any pupils credited under that court order who did not attend the basic aid school district before the 1995–96 fiscal year.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b), “basic aid school district” means a school district that does not receive from the state, for any fiscal year in which this section is applied, an apportionment of state funds pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 42238.02.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 22.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Low-Performing Students Block Grant [41570. - 41570.]

41570.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) It is imperative that the state address the persistent academic achievement gap in California’s public schools that has led to inequitable outcomes and opportunities for children.

(2) Several factors, including those that are the residual effects of the historical oppression of disempowered communities, contribute to low academic performance.

(3) Helping all pupils succeed requires both resources and evidence-based practices to initiate and sustain authentic systemic change.

(b) For
 the 2018–19 fiscal year, the sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Controller for transfer to Section A of the State School Fund for allocation by the Superintendent to establish the Low-Performing Students Block Grant in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section.

(c) The Low-Performing Students Block Grant is hereby established as a state education funding initiative with the goal of providing grant funds to local educational agencies serving pupils identified as low-performing on state English language arts or mathematics assessments who are not otherwise identified for supplemental grant funding under the local control funding formula or eligible for special education services, as described in subdivision (d).

(d) The Superintendent shall allocate an equal amount per pupil during the 2018–19
 fiscal year to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools for pupils meeting all of the following criteria:

(1) The pupil does not meet academic achievement standards based on the most recently available results of the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, established by Article 4 (commencing with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 of Division 4, in any of the following ways:

(A) The pupil does not meet the achievement standard, also referred to as “level 1,” in both English language arts and mathematics.

(B) The pupil does not meet the achievement standard, also referred to as “level 1,” in either English language arts or mathematics, and nearly meets the achievement standard, also referred to as “level 2,” in the other subject.

(C) The pupil does not meet the achievement standard, also referred to as “level 1,” in either English language arts or mathematics, and does not have a valid score for the other subject.

(2) The pupil is not an unduplicated pupil, as defined in Section 42238.02, for the same school year used as the basis for the performance results.

(3) The pupil is not a pupil identified for special education services pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), for the same school year used as the basis for the performance results.

(e) Block grant funds allocated to eligible school districts, county offices of education, or charter schools pursuant to this section are available for expenditure or encumbrance through
 the 2020–21 fiscal year and shall be used for evidence-based services that directly support pupil academic achievement, including, but not limited to, professional development activities for certificated staff, instructional materials, or additional supports for pupils.

(f) (1) As a condition for receiving grant funds pursuant to this section, a school district, county office of education, or charter school shall develop a plan describing how the funds will increase or improve evidence-based services for the pupils identified pursuant to subdivision (d) to accelerate increases in academic achievement, and how the effectiveness of the services will be measured. The plan shall include information regarding how the services align with and are described in the school district’s local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 52060, the county superintendent of schools’ local control and accountability plan
 required pursuant to Section 52066, or the charter school’s local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 47605 or 47605.6 and Section 47606.5, as applicable. To ensure community and stakeholder input, the plan shall be discussed and adopted at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the school district, the county board of education, or the governing body of the charter school.

(2) Grant recipients shall report to the Superintendent on or before March 1, 2019, regarding the adopted plan to use the grant funds to increase the academic performance of pupils identified pursuant to subdivision (d). On or before November 1, 2021, grant recipients shall report to the Superintendent regarding the implementation of the plan, the strategies used, and whether those strategies increased the academic performance of the pupils identified pursuant subdivision (d).

(3) The department shall compile the information reported pursuant to this subdivision and submit reports to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before July 1, 2019, and on or before February 1, 2022, and shall update the state board on the contents of those reports.

(g) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2017–18 fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 31.5.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. College Readiness Block Grant [41580. - 41580.]

41580.

(a) The sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Superintendent for transfer by the Controller to Section A of the State School Fund for allocation by the Superintendent to establish the College Readiness Block Grant in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section.

(b) The College Readiness Block Grant is hereby established for the purposes of providing California’s high school pupils, particularly unduplicated pupils as defined in Sections 42238.01 and 42238.02, additional supports to increase the number of pupils who enroll at institutions of higher education and complete an undergraduate degree within four years.

(c) The
 Superintendent shall allocate an equal amount per unduplicated pupil enrolled in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, during the 2015–16 fiscal year to school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools. A school district, county office of education, or charter school serving at least one unduplicated pupil in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, during the 2015–16 fiscal year shall receive a total allocation of not less than seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000). A school district, county office of education, or charter school is eligible for an allocation pursuant to this subdivision only for unduplicated pupils, as defined in Sections 42238.01 and 42238.02, attending a school that is currently accredited or in the process of obtaining accreditation from the Accrediting Commission for Schools, Western Association of Schools and Colleges. These funds are available for expenditure or encumbrance through the 2018–19 fiscal year.

(d) Block grant
 funds apportioned to eligible local educational agencies shall be used for activities that directly support pupil access and successful matriculation to institutions of higher education. Eligible activities may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Providing teachers, administrators, and counselors with professional development opportunities to improve pupil A–G course completion rates, pupil college-going rates, and college readiness of pupils, including providing for the development of honors and Advanced Placement courses.

(2) Beginning or increasing counseling services to pupils and their families regarding college admission requirements and financial aid programs.

(3) Developing or purchasing materials that support college readiness, including materials that support high performance on assessments
 required for admittance to a postsecondary educational institution.

(4) Developing comprehensive advising plans to support pupil completion of A–G course requirements.

(5) Implementing collaborative partnerships between high schools and postsecondary educational institutions that support pupil transition to postsecondary education, including, but not limited to, strengthening existing partnerships with the University of California and the California State University to establish early academic outreach and college preparatory programs.

(6) Providing subsidies to unduplicated pupils, as defined in Sections 42238.01 and 42238.02, to pay fees for taking Advanced Placement examinations.

(7) Expanding access to coursework or other opportunities to satisfy
 A–G course requirements to all pupils, including, but not necessarily limited to, pupils enrolled in schools identified by the department as high schools with 75 percent or greater enrollment of unduplicated pupils, pursuant to subdivision (g). These opportunities may include, but shall not be limited to, new or expanded partnerships with other secondary or postsecondary educational institutions.

(e) As a condition for receiving funds under this article, a school district, county office of education, or charter school shall develop a plan describing how the funds will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils to ensure college readiness. The plan shall include information regarding how it aligns with the school district’s local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 52060, the county superintendent of schools’ local control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 52066, or the charter school’s local
 control and accountability plan required pursuant to Section 47605 or 47605.6 and Section 47606.5. The plan shall also include a description of the extent to which all pupils within the school district, county office of education, or charter school, particularly unduplicated pupils, as defined in Sections 42238.01 and 42238.02, will have access to A–G courses approved by the University of California. In order to ensure community and stakeholder input, the plan shall be discussed at a regularly scheduled meeting by the governing board of the school district, county board of education, or governing body of the charter school and adopted at a subsequent regularly scheduled meeting.

(f) As a condition for receiving funds under this article, grant recipients shall report to the Superintendent by January 1, 2017, on how they will measure the impact of the funds received on their unduplicated pupils’ access and successful matriculation to institutions
 of higher education, as identified within their plan. The department shall compile the information reported pursuant to this subdivision and submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before April 30, 2017, and shall update the state board on the contents of that report at a regularly scheduled meeting of the state board.

(g) The Superintendent shall annually post on the department’s internet website a list of each school with a percentage of unduplicated pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, of at least 75 percent of the school’s total enrollment in grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(h) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriations made by subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision
 (c) of Section 41202, for the 2015–16 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2015–16 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 57.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Dual Enrollment Opportunities [41585. - 41585.]

41585.

(a) Contingent upon an appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute, the department, in consultation with the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, shall, beginning on or before January 1, 2023, administer a competitive grant program to do all of the following:

(1) Enable more local educational agencies to establish either middle college or early college high schools or programs that provide pupils with access to obtain college credits while enrolled in high school.

(2) Provide incentives for local educational agencies to establish dual enrollment course opportunities that are consistent with the requirements of Section 76004.

(3) Enable local educational agencies with existing middle college or early college high schools or programs or College and Career Access Pathways partnerships established pursuant to Section 76004 to couple robust pupil advising and success supports with dual enrollment opportunities and establish outreach campaigns to promote dual enrollment for new or existing middle college or early college high schools or programs or College and Career Access Pathways partnerships established pursuant to Section 76004. For local educational agencies with College and Career Access Pathways partnerships, outreach shall be focused toward families and pupils who may not be college bound or who are underrepresented in higher education.

(b) (1) Of the funds appropriated in support of this grant program, the
 department shall provide approved applicants with
 any of the following, as applicable:

(A) A one-time grant of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) to support the costs to plan for and start up a, or a one-time grant of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to expand an existing, middle college or early college high school or program that is located on the campus of a local educational agency, a partnering community college, or other location determined by the local partnership, and that is consistent with the specifications of Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 11300) of Part 7 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(B) A one-time grant of up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to establish a College and Career Access Pathways dual enrollment partnership agreement that is consistent with the requirements of Section 76004 and to enable pupils at the participating high
 school to access dual enrollment opportunities pursuant to the College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement.

(C) For an applicant who has previously received a grant to establish or expand College and Career Access Pathways partnerships or middle college or early college high school programs pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B), a renewal grant upon the completion of the requirements pertaining to that specific grant type, provided they are not currently in an active grant period for that grant type.

(2) Nothing shall preclude a local educational agency from using any unexpended funds received for the purposes of paragraph (1) to collaborate with their
 partner community college to access pupil advising and success support services offered by the partner community college district.

(3) Nothing shall preclude a local educational agency from using any unexpended funds received for the purposes of subparagraph of paragraph (1) to support the professional development of educators to meet minimum standards to teach dual enrollment courses.

(4) A local educational agency may request grants from any of the opportunities specified in
 paragraph (1).

(5) As a condition of funding pursuant to this section, a local educational agency receiving a grant shall develop a plan for continued financial and administrative support of dual enrollment opportunities at schoolsites with coursework supported by the grant for a period of no less than three years after the end of the grant period, and provide to the department a written commitment to do so.

(c) (1) A local educational agency seeking a grant under this section shall submit an application to the department at a time, in a manner, and with any appropriate information, as the
 department may reasonably require, including, but not limited to, evidence of an existing or planned partnership with an institution of higher education for the creation of the dual enrollment program.

(2) The department shall give priority to available grant funds to support applications from local educational agencies that display any of the following characteristics:

(A) The local educational agency has a higher than state average rate of unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02.

(B) The local educational agency has a higher than state average dropout
 rate.

(C) The local educational agency has a higher than state average rate of suspension and a higher than state average rate of expulsion.

(D) The local educational agency has higher than state average rates of child homelessness, foster youth, or justice-involved youth.

(E) The local educational agency has a lower than state average rate of pupils completing all of the A–G courses required to be eligible for admission to the University of California or the California State University.

(F) The local educational agency does not have a College and Career Access Pathways dual enrollment partnership agreement that is consistent with the requirements of Section 76004.

(G) The local
 educational agency has not received previous dual enrollment funding pursuant to this section.

(3) The
 department shall allocate an additional grant of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to a local educational agency that uses grant funds received for purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) to expand dual enrollment opportunities directly to justice-involved youth in county-operated facilities.

(4) To ensure funds appropriated for the 2022–23 fiscal year are disbursed in a timely manner, the department
 shall begin disbursing funds for approved applicants on or before December 1, 2023.

(5) To ensure funds appropriated for the 2026–27 fiscal year are disbursed in a timely manner, the department shall begin disbursing funds for approved applicants on or before January 1, 2027.

(d) (1) Courses offered to high school pupils in dual enrollment programs pursuant to this section shall be part of structured, well-sequenced pathways and count toward postsecondary certificate or degree requirements, and are counted toward high school graduation requirements in equivalent subject areas.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that courses offered to high school pupils pursuant to a College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement established by Section 76004 are part of structured, well-sequenced pathways and consist of transfer-level courses, unless one of the following occurs:

(A) The pupil elects to participate in a degree or certificate pathway that is not met with transfer-level courses.

(B) The pupil, in mathematics, English, or both, in grade 10 or 11, would warrant access to innovative remediation coursework, as determined by the partnering local educational agency. The pupil may be placed into an innovative remediation course during their first year of participating in the College and Career Access Pathways partnership agreement as an intervention taken to ensure the pupil is on track to satisfactorily complete state and any local
 graduation requirements, as determined by the local educational agency, and is prepared for transfer-level coursework at a community college upon graduation.

(e) On or before June 30, 2024, on or before June 30, 2027, and on or before June 30, 2030, the department shall prepare a summary of how the funds in this section were disbursed and used to further the goals listed in subdivision (a), and shall submit the summary to the Department of Finance, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Senate Committee on Education, the Assembly Committee on Higher Education, and the Assembly Committee on Education. The summary shall include all of the following information:

(1) The number of grants awarded, disaggregated by local educational agency.

(2) A qualitative description of how the funding was used by local educational
 agencies to accomplish the goals listed in subdivision (a).

(3) The total number of high school pupils by schoolsite enrolled in dual enrollment programs disaggregated by participation in middle college high schools or programs, early college high schools or programs, College and Career Access Pathways, and other dual enrollment programs.

(4) The total number of community college courses by course category taken by pupils participating in middle college high schools or programs, early college high schools or programs, College and Career Access Pathways, and other dual enrollment programs.
